test/src/morphology/NUM-seichchie_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Numeral - hardie: # Noun 'seven / seitsemän' - full paradigm
     seiččie+Num+Card+Sg+Nom: seiččie
     seiččie+Num+Card+Sg+Gen: seiččemen
     seiččie+Num+Card+Sg+Acc: [seiččie, seiččemen]
     seiččie+Num+Card+Sg+Par: seičendy
     seiččie+Num+Card+Sg+Tra: seiččemekse
     seiččie+Num+Card+Sg+Abe: [seiččemettäh, seiččemetä]
     seiččie+Num+Card+Sg+Com: seiččemenke
     seiččie+Num+Card+Sg+Ine: seiččemes
     seiččie+Num+Card+Sg+Ela: [seiččemespäi, seiččemes]
     seiččie+Num+Card+Sg+Ill: seiččemeh
     seiččie+Num+Card+Sg+Ade: seiččemel
     seiččie+Num+Card+Sg+Abl: [seiččemelpäi, seiččemel]
     seiččie+Num+Card+Sg+All: seiččemele
     seiččie+Num+Card+Sg+Ess: seiččemenny
     seiččie+Num+Card+Sg+Ter: seiččemessäh
     seiččie+Num+Card+Sg+Apr: seiččemellyö
     seiččie+Num+Card+Pl+Nom: seiččemet
     seiččie+Num+Card+Pl+Gen: seiččemin
     seiččie+Num+Card+Pl+Acc: seiččemet
     seiččie+Num+Card+Pl+Par: seiččemii
     seiččie+Num+Card+Pl+Tra: seiččemikse
     seiččie+Num+Card+Pl+Abe: [seiččemittäh, seiččemitä]
     seiččie+Num+Card+Pl+Com: seiččeminke
     seiččie+Num+Card+Pl+Ine: seiččemis
     seiččie+Num+Card+Pl+Ela: [seiččemispäi, seiččemis]
     seiččie+Num+Card+Pl+Ill: seiččemih
     seiččie+Num+Card+Pl+Ade: seiččemil
     seiččie+Num+Card+Pl+Abl: [seiččemilpäi, seiččemil]
     seiččie+Num+Card+Pl+All: seiččemile
     seiččie+Num+Card+Pl+Ess: seiččeminny
     seiččie+Num+Card+Pl+Ins: seiččemin
     seiččie+Num+Card+Pl+Apr: seiččemillyö
     seiččie+Num+Card+Sg+Nom+Clt/gi: seiččiegi
     seiččie+Num+Card+Sg+Gen+Clt/gi: seiččemengi
     seiččie+Num+Card+Sg+Acc+Clt/gi: [seiččiegi, seiččemengi]
     seiččie+Num+Card+Sg+Par+Clt/gi: seičendygi
     seiččie+Num+Card+Sg+Tra+Clt/gi: seiččemeksegi
     seiččie+Num+Card+Sg+Abe+Clt/gi: [seiččemettähgi, seiččemetägi]
     seiččie+Num+Card+Sg+Com+Clt/gi: seiččemenkegi
     seiččie+Num+Card+Sg+Ine+Clt/gi: seiččemesgi
     seiččie+Num+Card+Sg+Ela+Clt/gi: [seiččemespäigi, seiččemesgi]
     seiččie+Num+Card+Sg+Ill+Clt/gi: seiččemehgi
     seiččie+Num+Card+Sg+Ade+Clt/gi: seiččemelgi
     seiččie+Num+Card+Sg+Abl+Clt/gi: [seiččemelpäigi, seiččemelgi]
     seiččie+Num+Card+Sg+All+Clt/gi: seiččemelegi
     seiččie+Num+Card+Sg+Ess+Clt/gi: seiččemennygi
     seiččie+Num+Card+Sg+Ter+Clt/gi: seiččemessähgi
     seiččie+Num+Card+Sg+Apr+Clt/gi: seiččemellyögi
     seiččie+Num+Card+Pl+Nom+Clt/gi: seiččemetgi
     seiččie+Num+Card+Pl+Gen+Clt/gi: seiččemingi
     seiččie+Num+Card+Pl+Acc+Clt/gi: seiččemetgi
     seiččie+Num+Card+Pl+Par+Clt/gi: seiččemiigi
     seiččie+Num+Card+Pl+Tra+Clt/gi: seiččemiksegi
     seiččie+Num+Card+Pl+Abe+Clt/gi: [seiččemittähgi, seiččemitägi]
     seiččie+Num+Card+Pl+Com+Clt/gi: seiččeminkegi
     seiččie+Num+Card+Pl+Ine+Clt/gi: seiččemisgi
     seiččie+Num+Card+Pl+Ela+Clt/gi: [seiččemispäigi, seiččemisgi]
     seiččie+Num+Card+Pl+Ill+Clt/gi: seiččemihgi
     seiččie+Num+Card+Pl+Ade+Clt/gi: seiččemilgi
     seiččie+Num+Card+Pl+Abl+Clt/gi: [seiččemilpäigi, seiččemilgi]
     seiččie+Num+Card+Pl+All+Clt/gi: seiččemilegi
     seiččie+Num+Card+Pl+Ess+Clt/gi: seiččeminnygi
     seiččie+Num+Card+Pl+Ins+Clt/gi: seiččemingi
     seiččie+Num+Card+Pl+Apr+Clt/gi: seiččemillyögi
